Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 2

Unfair Trade Practices

53-3-201. Part definitions and general provisions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bulk milk” means milk in bulk form that is furnished to a processor for the purpose of processing and manufacturing into milk products;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Cost to the processor or distributor” means the actual cost of bulk milk and other ingredients, plus the cost of doing business properly allocable to each item covered by the term “milk products,” which cost of doing business includes, but is not limited to, labor, employee salaries, rent, maintenance and depreciation on real and personal property, shrinkage, interest, power, supplies, advertising, transportation and delivery costs, credit losses, all permits and license fees, all taxes, insurance and any and all other overhead expenses;

In the absence of proof to the contrary, the actual cost of bulk milk shall be presumed to be the cost as established by a federal marketing order effective in the area, or, if higher, the price established by a producer cooperative; or, in the absence of either, then the price that is effective in the nearest marketing area covered by a federal marketing order; and

The profit derived from the sale of one (1) product, whether the product is one of those included in the term “milk products,” or some other product, shall not be utilized in cost computations as a credit to, or deductions from, the cost of doing business properly allocable to any product embraced by the term milk products, so as to subsidize or lower the cost of doing business with respect to the milk products;

“Cost to the retailer” means the invoice price paid by the retailer for milk products, plus that portion of the retailer's overhead or cost of doing business properly allocable to the milk products, which cost of doing business shall include the same items of expense as are enumerated in the definition of cost to the processor or distributor in subdivision (3);

In the absence of specific evidence, the cost of doing business of a retailer shall be presumed to be ten percent (10%) of the invoice price, this cost to be calculated to the nearest whole cent on each sales unit; and

The cost of doing business of a retailer includes the fair value of any concession, of any kind whatever, that has the effect of reducing the actual sales price or increasing the cost of the goods delivered for the price stated in the invoice, including, but not limited to, the cost to the retailer of trading stamps or redeemable coupons;

“Distributor” means any person engaged in the business of selling or offering for sale within the state milk products for consideration, where the property is sold for the purpose of resale or further processing, or is to be used or consumed by the purchaser and not resold or used for the purpose of further processing;

“Milk products” means all or any one (1) of the following: market milk, pasteurized milk, vitamin-D milk, homogenized milk, flavored milk or flavored milk drinks, sweet cream, whipping cream, homogenized cream, skim milk, cottage cheese, buttermilk, and cultured buttermilk, as those products are defined by the commissioner under § 53-3-104, bulk milk as defined in this section, and all other products offered for sale by a milk processor or distributor, derived, in whole or in part, from milk, and frozen desserts, as described and defined by the commissioner under § 53-3-104;

“Person” means and includes one (1) or more individuals, partnerships, associations, incorporated, unincorporated or cooperative, corporations, legal representatives, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, or any other business unit, or any combination of these, except where the context otherwise requires;

“Processor” means any person engaged in the business of processing or packaging bulk milk and other materials into milk products; and

“Retailer” means any person, whether or not a processor or distributor, engaged in the business of selling or offering for sale within the state milk products for a consideration, where the milk products are to be used or consumed by the purchaser and are not to be resold or used for the purpose of manufacture or further processing.

Acts 1955, ch. 74, § 1; 1957, ch. 109, § 1; 1961, ch. 203, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 52-331; Acts 2005, ch. 300, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Food, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Statutory Restrictions on Selling Below Cost (Homer Clark), 11 Vand. L. Rev. 105.

Attorney General Opinions. Unfair trade practices under the Tennessee Dairy Law. OAG 12-03, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/13/12).

53-3-202. Prohibited practices.

The prohibited practices described in this section are declared to be unfair trade practices and are prohibited and made unlawful when done with the intent or with the effect of injuring a competitor, of destroying competition or of creating a monopoly.

No processor or distributor shall do, nor shall any retailer accept the benefit of, any of the following:

Advertise, offer to sell or sell within the state, at wholesale or retail, any milk product for less than cost to the processor or distributor;

Discriminate in price in the sale of any milk product between any of the towns or counties of this state; provided, that different prices that reflect actual transportation cost from point of processing to point of sale, or the actual transportation cost from point of purchase to point of resale, shall not be construed as discriminatory; or

Give or offer to give any retailer or prospective retail customer of a processor or distributor, or of their agents or employees, any free service or any other thing of value, including, but not limited to, the following, which, together with any similar practices, are declared to be unfair trade practices when conducted with the intent of committing any of the acts outlined in this section: advertising allowance; brokerage fees or payments, or sales commissions, a part or all of which are passed on by the ostensible recipient of the fees, payments or commissions to the customer; compensation for jointly used advertising space; advertising displays of any kind, including, but not limited to, newspaper advertising, hand bills, booklets, television or radio advertising, and signs in or outside of the customer's place of business; furnishing of hosts or hostesses or demonstrators in stores to make sales to the store's customers; donations directly or indirectly made, whether by way of money, goods, labor or services; free equipment; cleaning and servicing of equipment; or rent on space used by retailer for storing or displaying processor's or distributor's merchandise. However, nothing in this subdivision (b)(3) shall be construed as prohibiting the furnishing, free of cost by a processor or distributor to a retailer, at the retailer's place of business, printed advertising material, such as recipes and informational materials for the promotion of the sale of the processor's or distributor's products.

No retailer shall advertise, offer to sell or sell within the state any milk product for less than cost to the retailer.

No person shall advertise, offer to sell or sell any milk product with any other commodity or service at a combined price that is less than the aggregate of the prices for which the milk product and the other commodity or service is separately offered for sale.

In all proceedings brought to enforce this section, proof of consistent or repeated advertisements, offers to sell or sales of milk products at less than cost, as defined in this part, the advertisements, offers to sell and sales forming a pattern of sales below cost, shall be prima facie evidence of the intent to injure competitors and destroy or lessen competition.

Acts 1955, ch. 74, § 2; 1957, ch. 109, § 1; 1961, ch. 203, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-332; Acts 2005, ch. 300, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Food, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Advising Your Client on Fair Trade in Tennessee (Thomas M. Keeling), 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 260.

Attorney General Opinions. Unfair trade practices under the Tennessee Dairy Law. OAG 12-03, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/13/12).

Cited: Walker v. Bruno's, Inc., 650 S.W.2d 357, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 775 (Tenn. 1983).

53-3-203. Penalty for violations — Enforcement procedures — Regulations — Delegation of duties and powers by commissioner.

Any person, or any trade association that is a representative of the person, claiming to be injured by reason of a violation of this part is authorized to file a written complaint with the commissioner, setting forth evidence the person may have, alleging that milk or milk products are being sold or offered for sale in violation of this part to the injury of the petitioner or injury to competition. Upon the filing of the complaint, the commissioner shall, with reasonable notice, require the person accused of violating this part to appear and answer the complaint and show cause why penalties provided in this part should not be imposed.

Upon the finding by the commissioner that a violation of this part has occurred, the commissioner may:

Revoke or suspend any license or permit issued by the department to the person found in violation of this part;

Seek injunctive relief in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any violation of this part;

Impose civil penalties of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) each day that a violation occurs; or

Recover any and all expenses for investigation and prosecution of violations of this part from any person found in violation.

The commissioner, any aggrieved person, or any trade association that is a representative of the person, may file an original injunction in the chancery court of the county in which the person who violates this part resides, to enjoin further violations of this part.

The commissioner has the additional powers and duties to:

Issue rules and regulations for the enforcement of this part, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5; and

Conduct hearings in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and has the authority to issue subpoenas duces tecum, and have access to the records of those persons regulated by this part that are necessary and reasonable for the enforcement of this part.

Acts 1955, ch. 74, § 3; 1957, ch. 109, § 1; 1959, ch. 79, § 2; 1961, ch. 203, § 3; modified; T.C.A., § 52-333; modified; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2005, ch. 300, § 3.

Cross-References. Court's power to punish for contempt, § 16-1-103.

Punishment for contempt, title 29, ch. 9.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Food, § 7.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

Cited: Walker v. Bruno's, Inc., 650 S.W.2d 357, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 775 (Tenn. 1983).

53-3-204. Exemptions.

Section 53-3-202 shall not apply to advertisements or offers to sell, or sales, where:

The sales are made in an isolated transaction and not in the usual course of business, including, but not limited to, date commemoration, promotional events, grand openings and other temporary price reductions not intended to injure a competitor or injure or destroy competition. The isolated transactions shall not exceed three (3) days per month and, in any event, shall not exceed a total of fifteen (15) days in a twelve-month period;

The merchandise is damaged;

The items are sold upon the final liquidation of any business;

The items are sold or given away for any charitable purposes;

Bids are made in response to invitations from federal, state, county or municipal institutions and agencies, and contracts and deliveries pursuant to responses to invitations;

The items are sold by an officer acting under the direction of any court;

The price of the items is made in good faith to meet competition; provided, that the prices shall not be cut more than once, nor, in any event, cut below the price of competition;

The items are sold for consumption on the premises where sold; or

The items are sold within twenty-four (24) hours of the expiration or sell-by date imprinted on the item.

Acts 1955, ch. 74, § 4; 1957, ch. 109, § 1; 1961, ch. 203, § 4; T.C.A., § 52-334; Acts 2005, ch. 300, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Food, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Trade Regulation — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Leo J. Raskind), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 913.

Attorney General Opinions. Unfair trade practices under the Tennessee Dairy Law. OAG 12-03, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/13/12).

Cited: Walker v. Bruno's, Inc., 650 S.W.2d 357, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 775 (Tenn. 1983).